Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-603.01
Railroad operating property; sale; report by purchaser; contents; penalty; waiver.

The sale of railroad operating property as defined in section 77-602 shall be reported by the purchaser to the Property Tax Administrator within thirty days after the date of sale. The purchaser shall identify the seller, the date of the sale, any change in the name of the railroad, the main track and sidetrack mileage located in each political subdivision, and the purchase price. If additional information regarding the sale is deemed necessary, the Property Tax Administrator shall make a written request for such information to the purchaser or seller. This requirement shall apply only to a purchaser subject to section 77-603. For each day's failure to furnish the information required to be reported by this section, the Tax Commissioner shall assess a penalty in the amount of one hundred dollars, except that the penalty shall not exceed ten thousand dollars. Such penalty shall be collected by the Tax Commissioner and credited to the Department of Revenue Property Assessment Division Cash Fund. The Tax Commissioner may waive all or part of the penalty provided in this section.

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 26;

Laws 1999, LB 36, § 13;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 32.